District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0837.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
29 act may be cited as the “Park 7 Affordable Housing Preservation Tax Abatement Amendment Act
30 of 2026”.
31 Sec. 2. Chapter 46 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
32 follows:
33 (a) The table of contents is amended by adding a new section designation to read as
34 follows:
35 “47-4685. Park 7 affordable housing preservation tax abatement.”.
36 (b) A new section 47-4685 is added to read as follows:
1

37 “Sec. 47-4685. Park 7 affordable housing preservation tax abatement.
38 “(a) For purposes of this section, the term:
39 “(1) “Capital Improvement” means a physical improvement to the
40 Property that:
41 “(A) Materially extends the useful life of the Property or a major
42 building component or system;
43 “(B) Improves the health, safety, security, accessibility, energy
44 efficiency, or habitability of the Property;
45 “(C) Replaces or substantially rehabilitates a major building
46 component or system; or
47 “(D) Otherwise constitutes an eligible capital improvement
48 approved by the Mayor.
49 “(2) “District financial assistance” means a grant, loan, tax credit, tax
50 abatement, or other financial assistance provided by the District government for the
51 rehabilitation or operation of the Property; provided, that the term shall not include the tax
52 abatement authorized by this section.
53 “(3) “Owner” means the Park 7 Residential Limited Partnership, its
54 successor in interest, or another entity that acquires the Property and assumes the obligations
55 imposed by this section.
56 “(4) “Property” means the real property, including any improvements
57 thereon, located at 4020 Minnesota Avenue, N.E., Washington, D.C. 20019, known for tax and
58 assessment purposes as Lot 811 in Square 5052 (SSL 5052-0811), or as the land may
2

59 subsequently be subdivided into record lots, assessment and taxation lots, condominium lots, air-
60 rights lots, or any combination thereof.
61 “(5) “Qualifying Capital Expenditure” means an expenditure actually paid
62 by the Owner from non-District funds for a Capital Improvement included in a capital
63 improvement plan approved pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.
64 “(B) The term “Qualifying Capital Expenditure” shall not include:
65 “(i) Routine maintenance or ordinary operating expenses;
66 “(ii) Management fees;
67 “(iii) Debt service;
68 “(iv) Distributions to owners or investors;
69 “(v) Penalties or interest;
70 “(vi) Legal, accounting, or other professional expenses not
71 directly attributable to a Capital Improvement; or
72 “(vii) The portion of an expenditure paid or reimbursed
73 with District financial assistance.
74 “(6) “Tax year” means a real property tax year of the District.
75 “(b)(1) Subject to subsections (c) through (j) of this section, for the 7 consecutive tax
76 years beginning on October 1, 2027, the Property shall be allowed an annual real property tax
77 abatement equal to the lesser of:
78 “(A) Two hundred thirty thousand dollars;
79 “(B) The amount of real property taxes assessed and imposed on the
80 Property pursuant to Chapter 8 of this title for the applicable tax year, after application of any
81 other real property tax exemption, abatement, credit, or reduction applicable to the Property; or
3

82 “(C) The amount of Qualifying Capital Expenditures certified by the
83 Mayor as eligible to support the abatement for the applicable tax year.
84 “(2) The aggregate amount of the real property tax abatement provided pursuant
85 to this section shall not exceed $1,610,000.
86 “(3) An unused portion of the annual limitation provided in paragraph (1)(A) of
87 this subsection shall not be carried forward to increase the maximum abatement available in a
88 subsequent tax year.
89 “(4) An abatement shall not be allowed for a tax year unless the Mayor certifies
90 the Property as eligible for the abatement pursuant to subsection (e) of this section.
91 “(5) A suspension or disallowance of an abatement for any tax year shall not
92 extend the 7-tax-year period established by paragraph (1) of this subsection.
93 “(c)(1) As a condition of receiving an abatement pursuant to this section, the Owner shall
94 make Qualifying Capital Expenditures in an amount not less than $1 for each $1 of real property
95 tax abated pursuant to this section.
96 “(2) Before the Property may receive the first abatement pursuant to this section,
97 the Owner shall submit to the Mayor a capital improvement plan that includes:
98 “(A) A comprehensive assessment of the Property's capital needs;
99 “(B) A detailed scope of work;
100 “(C) An itemized rehabilitation budget;
101 “(D) A schedule for completing the proposed Capital Improvements;
102 “(E) The projected useful life of each major Capital Improvement;
103 “(F) All anticipated sources and uses of funds for the rehabilitation;
4

104 “(G) The amount of funding anticipated from owner equity, reserves,
105 loans, grants, tax credits, District financial assistance, federal assistance, or other sources;
106 “(H) A description of how the proposed Capital Improvements will benefit
107 existing residents; and
108 “(I) Any other information the Mayor determines necessary to evaluate the
109 proposed Capital Improvements.
110 “(3) The Mayor shall approve the capital improvement plan before certifying the
111 Property as eligible for an abatement.
112 “(4) The Owner shall obtain the Mayor's approval before making a material
113 modification to the approved capital improvement plan if the Owner intends to count
114 expenditures associated with the modification as Qualifying Capital Expenditures.
115 “(5) Capital Improvements may include:
116 “(A) Heating, ventilation, and air-conditioning systems;
117 “(B) Plumbing and water systems;
118 “(C) Electrical systems;
119 “(D) Elevators;
120 “(E) Roofs and building-envelope systems;
121 “(F) Water-intrusion, moisture, and mold remediation;
122 “(G) Residential-unit rehabilitation;
123 “(H) Common-area improvements;
124 “(I) Security and building-access systems;
125 “(J) Fire and life-safety systems;
126 “(K) Accessibility improvements;
5

127 “(L) Energy-efficiency and water-conservation improvements;
128 “(M) Pest-prevention improvements;
129 “(N) Structural repairs; and
130 “(O) Other Capital Improvements approved by the Mayor.
131 “(d)(1) As a condition of receiving an abatement pursuant to this section, the Owner shall,
132 throughout the abatement period:
133 “(A) Maintain all affordability restrictions applicable to the Property under
134 any affordability covenant, regulatory agreement, financing agreement, federal Low-Income
135 Housing Tax Credit requirement, Housing Production Trust Fund requirement, or other binding
136 District or federal requirement;
137 “(B) Not reduce the number of affordable residential units at the Property,
138 except as temporarily necessary to perform rehabilitation work;
139 “(C) Remain in substantial compliance with applicable housing, building,
140 fire, property-maintenance, and life-safety laws and regulations; and
141 “(D) Comply with the reporting and certification requirements of this
142 section.
143 “(2) No resident shall be permanently displaced solely as a result of a Capital
144 Improvement for which an expenditure is counted as a Qualifying Capital Expenditure.
145 “(3) If temporary relocation of a resident is necessary to complete a Capital
146 Improvement, the Owner shall, consistent with applicable District and federal law:
147 “(A) Provide reasonable advance notice;
148 “(B) Pay required relocation expenses;
6

149 “(C) Provide suitable temporary accommodations when required by law;
150 and
151 “(D) Provide the resident a right to return to the resident's unit or a
152 comparable unit at the Property upon completion of the work.
153 “(4) The Owner shall not use a Qualifying Capital Expenditure as the basis for a
154 rent surcharge, capital-improvement charge, or other separate charge to a tenant to recover the
155 portion of the Capital Improvement credited toward the matching requirement established by
156 subsection (c)(1) of this section.
157 “(e)(1) For each tax year for which an abatement is sought, the Owner shall provide the
158 Mayor with information sufficient for the Mayor to determine whether the Property satisfies the
159 requirements of this section.
160 “(2) The information required by paragraph (1) of this subsection shall include:
161 “(A) The amount of Qualifying Capital Expenditures made during the
162 applicable reporting period;
163 “(B) Documentation demonstrating that the expenditures were made in
164 accordance with the approved capital improvement plan;
165 “(C) Documentation demonstrating the source of funds used to pay each
166 expenditure claimed as a Qualifying Capital Expenditure;
167 “(D) The cumulative amount of Qualifying Capital Expenditures made
168 pursuant to this section;
169 “(E) The cumulative amount of real property tax abated pursuant to this
170 section;
7

171 “(F) Documentation demonstrating compliance with the affordability
172 requirements of subsection (d) of this section;
173 “(G) Information regarding any material housing, building, fire, property-
174 maintenance, or life-safety violations at the Property;
175 “(H) The amount of the real property tax abatement requested for the
176 applicable tax year; and
177 “(I) Any other information the Mayor determines necessary.
178 “(3) Documentation supporting an expenditure claimed as a Qualifying Capital
179 Expenditure shall include, as applicable:
180 “(A) Paid invoices;
181 “(B) Proof of payment;
182 “(C) Executed construction contracts or purchase orders;
183 “(D) Permits and inspection records;
184 “(E) Documentation of the source of funds;
185 “(F) Photographs or other evidence of completed work; and
186 “(G) An independent certification by a certified public accountant or other
187 qualified third party, if required by the Mayor.
188 “(4) By December 31 of each tax year during the abatement period, the Mayor
189 shall determine the amount of the abatement for which the Property is eligible and shall certify
190 that amount to the Office of Tax and Revenue.
191 “(5) The Mayor's certification shall include:
192 “(A) The Owner's taxpayer identification number;
8

193 “(B) A description of the Property by street address and square and lot
194 number;
195 “(C) A statement as to whether the Owner has satisfied the requirements of
196 this section;
197 “(D) The amount of the abatement for which the Property is eligible for
198 the applicable tax year; and
199 “(E) Any other information the Office of Tax and Revenue considers
200 necessary or appropriate.
201 “(6) If the Mayor determines at any time that the Property has become ineligible
202 for an abatement, the Mayor shall notify the Office of Tax and Revenue of the ineligibility and
203 the date on which the Property became ineligible.
204 “(f)(1) Following certification by the Mayor pursuant to subsection (e) of this section,
205 the Office of Tax and Revenue shall process the abatement for the applicable tax year.
206 “(2) The Chief Financial Officer may audit information or documentation relating
207 to the amount of an abatement or the application of an abatement to the Property.
208 “(g)(1) The Mayor shall suspend eligibility for an abatement if the Mayor determines that
209 the Owner:
210 “(A) Has failed to satisfy the dollar-for-dollar expenditure requirement
211 established by subsection (c)(1) of this section;
212 “(B) Has materially deviated from the approved capital improvement plan
213 without approval;
214 “(C) Has materially violated an applicable affordability requirement;
215 “(D) Has failed to provide required reports or documentation;
9

216 “(E) Has submitted materially false or misleading information;
217 “(F) Is in material violation of an applicable housing, building, fire,
218 property-maintenance, or life-safety law or regulation and has failed to timely correct the
219 violation; or
220 “(G) Is otherwise in material violation of this section.
221 “(2) Except in a case involving fraud, intentional misrepresentation, an imminent
222 threat to health or safety, or a violation that cannot reasonably be cured, the Mayor shall provide
223 the Owner written notice of the violation and at least 60 days to cure the violation before
224 suspending eligibility.
225 “(3) No abatement shall accrue during a period in which the Property is ineligible.
226 “(h)(1) If the Owner receives an abatement that exceeds the amount for which the
227 Property was eligible under this section, the Mayor shall notify the Office of Tax and Revenue of
228 the amount improperly abated.
229 “(2) Upon receiving notice pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Office
230 of Tax and Revenue shall restore to the tax roll the amount of real property tax improperly
231 abated, together with applicable interest calculated from the date the tax otherwise would have
232 been due.
233 “(3) If the Mayor determines that an abatement was obtained through fraud,
234 intentional misrepresentation, falsification of expenditures or records, or diversion of funds
235 represented as Qualifying Capital Expenditures to a nonqualifying purpose, the Mayor shall
236 notify the Office of Tax and Revenue, which shall recapture the full amount of the abatement
237 improperly received, together with applicable interest.
10

238 “(4) If the Owner materially violates an affordability requirement imposed by
239 subsection (d) of this section during the abatement period, the Mayor may determine that some
240 or all abatements received during the period of noncompliance are subject to recapture.
241 “(5) An amount recaptured pursuant to this subsection shall:
242 “(A) Constitute real property tax owed to the District;
243 “(B) Be collectible in the same manner as delinquent real property tax; and
244 “(C) Constitute a lien against the Property to the same extent as other
245 delinquent real property tax.
246 “(6) The remedies provided by this subsection are cumulative and shall not
247 preclude the District from exercising any other remedy available under law.
248 “(i)(1) The Owner shall provide the Mayor and the Chief Financial Officer written notice
249 at least 60 days before a sale of the Property or transfer of a controlling interest in the Owner.
250 “(2) A sale or transfer shall not terminate the abatement if:
251 “(A) The successor owner assumes in writing all obligations imposed by
252 this section;
253 “(B) The successor owner assumes the obligations of the approved capital
254 improvement plan;
255 “(C) All affordability restrictions applicable to the Property remain in
256 effect;
257 “(D) The successor owner is in compliance with the requirements of this
258 section; and
259 “(E) The Mayor certifies continuation of the abatement to the Office of
260 Tax and Revenue.
11

261 “(3) A sale or transfer shall not restart or extend the 7-tax-year abatement period
262 established by subsection (b)(1) of this section or increase the aggregate limitation established by
263 subsection (b)(2) of this section.
264 “(j)(1) On or before April 1 of each year following a tax year in which the Property
265 receives an abatement, the Owner shall submit to the Mayor and the Council a report describing:
266 “(A) The amount of real property tax abated during the preceding tax year;
267 “(B) The amount of Qualifying Capital Expenditures made;
268 “(C) The Capital Improvements completed or underway;
269 “(D) Progress toward completion of the approved capital improvement
270 plan;
271 “(E) The number of affordable residential units at the Property;
272 “(F) The occupancy rate of the Property;
273 “(G) The number of units temporarily unavailable because of
274 rehabilitation;
275 “(H) The amount and source of non-District funds invested in the
276 rehabilitation;
277 “(I) The amount and source of District financial assistance and federal
278 financial assistance used for the rehabilitation; and
279 “(J) Any material changes to the rehabilitation budget or schedule.
280 “(2) The Mayor shall make the report required by paragraph (1) of this subsection
281 publicly available, except for information protected from disclosure by District or federal law.
12

282 “(k)(1) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the Owner from combining the tax
283 abatement provided by this section with other financing or financial assistance necessary to
284 complete an approved Capital Improvement.
285 “(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Owner shall not count
286 toward the dollar-for-dollar expenditure requirement established by subsection (c)(1) of this
287 section the portion of an expenditure paid or reimbursed with District financial assistance.
288 “(3) The Owner shall disclose to the Mayor all District financial assistance used
289 or proposed to be used for rehabilitation of the Property.
290 “(4) An expenditure, or portion thereof, shall not be counted more than once
291 toward the dollar-for-dollar expenditure requirement.
292 “(l) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the Owner's right to appeal or
293 contest the real property tax assessment of the Property.
294 “(m) The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure
295 Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), may issue
296 rules necessary to implement this section.”.
297 Sec. 3. Applicability.
298 (a) This act shall apply upon the date of inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved
299 budget and financial plan.
300 (b) The Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in
301 an approved budget and financial plan to the Budget Director of the Council.
302 (c)(1) The Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in
303 the District of Columbia Register.
13

304 (2) The date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the
305 applicability of section 2.
306 Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
307 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
308 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
309 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
310 Sec. 5. Effective date.
311 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
312 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and a 30-day period of congressional review
313 as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
314 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
14